California statutes. Education Code
There is hereby established in the Neurology Department at the University of California, San Francisco, a research project on substance abuse. The major goal of this research is to identify new pharmaceutical agents to prevent or treat alcohol and drug addiction. It is the intent of the Legislature that dedicated state funding for this research will be provided for five years, and be appropriated in the annual Budget Act. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the augmentation of one million dollars ($1,000,000) per year appropriated in the Budget Act of 2000 for this program be used for permanent on-going support of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 71, Sec. 29.   Effective July 5, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.5. University of California-Mexico Research Programs [92830. - 92830.]

92830.

On or before March 15 of each year, until 2013, the University of California is requested to report to the Legislature on the facility for University of California-Mexico research and academic programs in Mexico City. The report shall include all of the following:

(a) The amount of state and nonstate funds spent to support the University of California-Mexico facility and the specific use of these funds.

(b) The amount of state and nonstate funds spent to support University of California-Mexico research and academic programs.

(c) A description of the different types of research conducted and the programs operated at the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 386, Sec. 20.   (AB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Governor’s Teacher Scholars Program [92850. - 92851.]

92850.

The Regents of the University of California are requested to develop a Governor’s Teacher Scholars Program, to operate, commencing July 1, 2000, at the Berkeley and Los Angeles campuses, and at additional University of California campuses, as deemed appropriate by the University, in accordance with all of the following:

(a) Prior to July 1, 2000, the university shall develop or accomplish all of the following:

(1) A rigorous teacher preparation program that prepares teachers to work in schools with high percentages of low income or English language learners and that culminates in the award of a master’s degree.

(2) Begin recruiting highly talented students who wish to become teachers.

(3) Conduct a fundraising effort to provide full scholarships to participants in the program.

(b) When the program is fully operational, a total of 400 students shall be selected to participate in the program. At least 100 of these students shall be enrolled at each of the Los Angeles and Berkeley campuses.

(c) A participant in the program shall receive a full scholarship, funded through private donations and other sources, to cover the costs of the participant related to the program. The amount of a scholarship under this section shall be limited to the amount of university fees charged to resident students and mandatory campus-based fees.

(d) A participant in the program shall be required to comply with the teaching requirements for participants in the Assumption Program of Loans for Education set forth in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 69613.

(e) A participant who leaves classroom teaching service before his or her four-year commitment is completed shall repay that portion of his or her scholarship assistance that is equal to the proportion of the four-year commitment that has not been completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 717, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

92851.

This chapter shall not apply to the University of California unless and until the Regents of the University of California act, by resolution, to make it applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 4.   Effective March 29, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Governor’s Principal Leadership Institute [92855. - 92856.]

92855.

The Regents of the University of California are requested to develop a Governor’s Principal Leadership Institute, to operate, commencing July 1, 2000, at the Berkeley and Los Angeles campuses of the university, in accordance with all of the following:

(a) Prior to July 1, 2000, the university shall develop a rigorous two-year administrator preparation program that culminates in the award of at least a master’s degree and which coursework shall apply to a doctoral degree, begin recruiting highly talented individuals who wish to become school principals, and conduct a fundraising effort to provide full scholarships to participants in the program.

(b) The university shall collaborate with existing principal professional development programs in establishing and administering the program.

(c) The program shall be interdisciplinary and shall draw upon the faculty expertise of a wide variety of professional schools, including, but not necessarily limited to, the schools of education, law, and business or management at the participating campuses.

(d) When the program is fully operational, a total of 400 students, composed of 200 students at each participating campus, shall be selected to participate in the program.

(e) Participants in the program shall receive full scholarships, funded through private donations and other sources, to cover the participants’ cost of the program. These scholarships shall be limited to university fees charged to resident students and mandatory campus-based fees.

(f) Participants in the program shall be required to make a commitment to serve four years as a principal, vice-principal, or in another administrative role, at a public elementary or secondary school.

(g) Participants who leave administrative service before their four-year commitment is completed shall repay that portion of their scholarship that is equal to the proportion of the four-year commitment that has not been completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 6.   Effective March 29, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

92856.

This chapter shall not apply to the University of California unless and until the Regents of the University of California act, by resolution, to make it applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 6.   Effective March 29, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. California Institutes for Science and Innovation [92900. - 92901.]

92900.

(a) The Regents of the University of California may establish four California Institutes for Science and Innovation at separate campuses of the University of California for the purpose of combining technological and scientific research and training and educating future scientists and technological leaders.

(b) Each institute shall be created pursuant to a competitive application process conducted by a panel selected by the Governor and administered by the University of California.

(c) In order to utilize the vast array of research and intellectual resources available from throughout the state, each institute may develop programs in cooperation with the private sector and with California’s other public and independent colleges and universities.

(d) The concentration of each institute may include, but shall not necessarily be limited to, any of the following:

(1) Medicine.

(2) Bioengineering.

(3) Telecommunications and information systems.

(4) Energy resources.

(5) Space.

(6) Agricultural technology.

(e) Funding for the state’s share of operating and facilities costs under this chapter is subject to appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 891, Sec. 28.   Effective October 14, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

92901.

It is the intent of the Legislature that all of the following occur:

(a) That the University of California receive seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) for each year for four years, for a total of three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) for the 2000–01 fiscal year to the 2003–04 fiscal year, inclusive, for capital and operating budget purposes.

(b) That the University of California receive twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) for each of the 2001–02 and 2002–03 fiscal years and thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) for each of the 2003–04 and 2004–05 fiscal years, for a total of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for capital and operating budget purposes.

(c) That a portion of the funds referenced in subdivisions (a) and (b) be available, in an amount not to exceed 5 percent of the annual appropriation, for annual operating budget expenditures. Upon completion of each project, the level of ongoing funding for the operating budget of the institutes will be determined by the Governor and the Legislature through the annual budget process.

(d) That the University of California will not seek further state funding for capital outlay associated with these four institutes beyond that provided within the four hundred million dollar ($400,000,000) total.

(e) Every dollar of state funds appropriated for these institutes shall be matched by at least two dollars ($2) of nonstate funds, including, but not necessarily limited to, federal and private funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 891, Sec. 29.   Effective October 14, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. The Richard McKee Transparency Act of 2011 [92950. - 92961.]

92950.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Mindful of the right of individuals to privacy, access to information concerning the conduct of the people’s business is a necessary and fundamental right of every person in this state.

(b) University of California campus foundations are independently governed charitable nonprofit corporations that are legally separate from the University of California (UC), but provide important support to the individual campuses of the UC and the UC system as a whole.

(c) The release of information maintained by University of California campus
 foundations to the public must be balanced by the need to protect the individual privacy rights of donors and volunteers and to protect the fiduciary interests of these organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 3.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

92951.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “UC campus foundation” means the following corporations organized under the laws of the State of California: University of California, Berkeley Foundation, UC Davis Foundation, the University of California, Irvine Foundation, the UCLA Foundation, University of California, Merced Foundation, UC Riverside Foundation, U.C. San Diego Foundation, University of California, San Francisco Foundation, UC Santa Barbara Foundation, U.C. Santa Cruz Foundation, and any other foundation authorized by the Regents of the University of California.

(b) “Identifiable writing” means any handwriting,
 typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, photocopying, transmitting by electronic mail or facsimile, and every other means of recording upon any tangible thing, any form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to, letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combinations thereof, and any record thereby created, regardless of the manner in which the record has been stored.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 3.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

92952.

(a) Records maintained by a UC campus foundation shall be available to the public to inspect or copy at all times during the office hours of the foundation, except as hereafter provided. The records subject to inspection or copying by the public pursuant to this section shall include any identifiable writing containing information relating to the conduct of the UC campus foundation that is prepared, owned, used, or retained by a UC campus foundation. Any reasonably segregable portion of a record shall be promptly available for inspection and copying after redacting those portions exempt from disclosure by law.

(b) Upon a request for a copy of a record that reasonably describes an identifiable record, a
 UC campus foundation shall make the record available within a reasonable time to any person upon payment of fees covering only the direct cost of duplication, except with respect to records maintained by a UC campus foundation exempt from disclosure by law. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit a UC campus foundation to delay or obstruct the inspection or copying of public records.

(c) If a member of the public requests to inspect a public record or obtain a copy of a record held by a UC campus foundation, the UC campus foundation shall assist the person to make a focused and effective request that reasonably describes an identifiable record or records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 3.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

92953.

(a) Upon a written request for a copy or inspection of records, a UC campus foundation shall determine, within 10 calendar days from the receipt of such request, whether the request, in whole or in part, seeks copies of disclosable records maintained by the UC campus foundation and shall notify the requester in writing without undue delay of the determination and the reasons therefor.

(b) (1) In unusual circumstances, the time limit prescribed in this section may be extended by a written notice by the head of the UC campus foundation, or his or her designee, to the person making the request that sets forth the reasons for the extension and the date on which a determination is
 expected to be sent. That notice shall not specify a date that would result in an extension of more than 14 days. When the UC campus foundation sends the determination, and if the UC campus foundation determines that the request seeks disclosable public records, the UC campus foundation shall state the estimated date and time when the records will be made available.

(2) As used in this section, “unusual circumstances” means the following, but only to the extent reasonably necessary to the proper processing of the particular request:

(A) The need to search for and collect the requested records from field facilities or other establishments that are separate from the office processing the request.

(B) The need to search for, collect, and appropriately examine a voluminous amount of separate and distinct records that are
 demanded in a single request.

(C) The need for consultation, which shall be conducted with all practicable speed, with another agency having a substantial interest in the determination of the request or among two or more components of the agency having a substantial subject matter interest therein.

(D) The need to compile data, to write programming language or a computer program, or to construct a computer report to extract data.

(c) A UC campus foundation shall justify withholding disclosure of a record by demonstrating that the record is exempt from disclosure by law, or that, on the facts of the particular request, the public interest served by not disclosing the record clearly outweighs the public interest served by disclosure of the record.

(d) A
 response to a written request for inspection or copies of public records that includes a determination that the request is denied, in whole or in part, shall be in writing and shall not set forth the names and titles or positions of each person responsible for the denial.

(e) This chapter shall not limit access to a public record on the basis of the purpose for which the record is being requested, if the record is otherwise subject to disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 3.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

92954.

(a) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, a UC campus foundation that has information that constitutes an identifiable record not exempt from disclosure pursuant to this chapter that is in an electronic format shall make that record available in an electronic format when requested by any person and, when applicable, shall comply with both of the following:

(1) A UC campus foundation shall make the electronic record available in the electronic format in which it holds the information.

(2) A UC campus foundation shall provide a copy of an electronic record in the format requested if the requested format is one that has been used by the UC
 campus foundation to create copies for its own use or for provision to other entities or persons. The cost of duplication shall be limited to the direct cost of producing a copy of a record in an electronic format.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the requester shall bear the cost of producing a copy of the record, including the cost to construct a record, and the cost of programming and computer services necessary to produce a copy of the record if either of the following applies:

(1) In order to comply with the provisions of subdivision (a), a UC campus foundation would be required to produce a copy of an electronic record and the record is one that is produced only at otherwise regularly scheduled intervals.

(2) The request would require data compilation, extraction, or programming to produce
 the record.

(c) If a request is for a record in a nonelectronic format, and the record is also available in an electronic format, a UC campus foundation may inform the requester that the record is available in an electronic format.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to do any of the following:

(1) Require a UC campus foundation to reconstruct a record in an electronic format if the UC campus foundation no longer has the record available in an electronic format.

(2) Permit a UC campus foundation to make a record available only in an electronic format.

(3) Require a UC campus foundation to release an electronic record in the electronic form in which it is held by the UC campus
 foundation if its release would jeopardize or compromise the security or integrity of the original record or of any proprietary software with which it is maintained.

(4) Permit public access to records held by any UC campus foundation to which access is otherwise restricted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 3.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

92955.

Nothing in this chapter shall require a UC campus foundation to disclose information that is exempt from disclosure pursuant to an exemption set forth in Section 7922.000 of the Government Code or in any provision listed in Section 7920.505 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 87.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

92956.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the following records maintained by a UC campus foundation shall not be subject to disclosure:

(1) Information that would disclose the identity of a donor, prospective donor, or volunteer.

(2) Personal financial information, estate planning information, and gift planning information of a donor, prospective donor, or volunteer.

(3) Personal information related to any of a donor’s private trusts or a donor’s private annuities administered by a UC campus foundation.

(4) Information related to fundraising plans, fundraising research, and solicitation strategies to the extent that these activities are not already protected under Section 99040, Title 5 (commencing with Section 3426) of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, Section 1060 of the Evidence Code, or Section 7927.705 of the Government Code.

(5) The identity of students and alumni to the extent that this information is already protected under state and federal statutes applicable to the University of California. This paragraph shall not apply to a part-time or full-time employee of the UC campus foundation, or to a student who participates in a legislative body of a student body organization on a University of California campus.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be construed to
 exempt from disclosure records that contain information regarding any of the following:

(1) The amount and date of a donation.

(2) Any donor-designated use or purpose of a donation.

(3) Any other donor-imposed restrictions on the use of a donation.

(4) (A) The identity of a donor who, in any fiscal year, makes a gift or gifts, in a quid pro quo arrangement, where either the value of the benefit received is in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or the benefit would be impermissible under state or federal law. In these circumstances, records pertaining to the gift or gifts maintained by a UC campus foundation that
 would otherwise be exempt from disclosure under subdivision (a) shall be disclosed.

(B) Annually, on January 1, the monetary threshold set forth in subparagraph (A) shall be adjusted upward or downward to reflect the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, rounded off to the nearest one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(5) Self-dealing transactions, including, but not limited to, loans of money or property, or material financial interests of or between foundation officers or directors and a UC campus foundation, as set forth in Sections 5233 and 5236 of the Corporations Code. In these circumstances, records pertaining to the self-dealing transactions maintained by a UC campus foundation that would otherwise be
 exempt from disclosure under subdivision (a) shall be disclosed.

(6) Any instance in which a volunteer or donor of a gift is awarded, within five years of the date of the service or gift, a contract from the university or UC campus foundation that was not subject to competitive bidding. In these circumstances, records
 pertaining to the service or gift maintained by the UC campus foundation that would otherwise be exempt from disclosure under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be disclosed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 88.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

92957.

Any person may institute proceedings for injunctive or declarative relief or writ of mandate in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce his or her right to inspect or to receive a copy of any record or class of records maintained by a UC campus foundation under this chapter. The times for responsive pleadings and for hearings in these proceedings shall be set by the judge of the court with the object of securing a decision as to these matters at the earliest possible time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 3.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

92958.

(a) Whenever it is made to appear by verified petition to the superior court of the county where the records or some part thereof are situated that certain records maintained by a UC campus foundation are being improperly withheld from a member of the public, the court shall order the officer or person charged with withholding the records to disclose the record or show cause why he or she should not do so. The court shall decide the case after examining the record in camera, if permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 915 of the Evidence Code, papers filed by the parties, and any oral argument and additional evidence as the court may allow.

(b) If the court finds that a UC campus foundation official’s
 decision to refuse disclosure is not justified under this chapter, he or she shall order the official to make the record public. If the judge determines that the official was justified in refusing to make the record public, he or she shall return the item to the official without disclosing its content with an order supporting the decision refusing disclosure.

(c) An order of the court, either directing disclosure by a UC campus foundation official or supporting the decision of the UC campus foundation official refusing disclosure, is not a final judgment or order within the meaning of Section 904.1 of the Code of Civil Procedure from which an appeal may be taken, but shall be immediately reviewable by petition to the appellate court for the issuance of an extraordinary writ. Upon entry of any order pursuant to this section, a party shall, in order to obtain review of the order, file a petition within 20 days after service upon him or her of a
 written notice of entry of the order, or within such further time not exceeding an additional 20 days as the trial court may for good cause allow. If the notice is served by mail, the period within which to file the petition shall be increased by five days. A stay of an order or judgment shall not be granted unless the petitioning party demonstrates it will otherwise sustain irreparable damage and probable success on the merits. Any person who fails to obey the order of the court shall be cited to show cause why he or she is not in contempt of court.

(d) The court shall award court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the plaintiff should the plaintiff prevail in litigation filed pursuant to this section. The costs and reasonable attorney’s fees shall be paid by the UC campus foundation of which the official is a member or employee and shall not become a personal liability of the UC campus foundation official. If the court finds that the
 plaintiff’s case is clearly frivolous, the court shall award court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the UC campus foundation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 3.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

92959.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, and except as provided for in subdivision (c), whenever a UC campus foundation discloses a record it maintains that is otherwise exempt from this chapter, this disclosure shall constitute a waiver of the exemptions specified in this chapter with regard to that record.

(b) For purposes of this section, “UC campus foundation” includes a member, agent, volunteer, or officer of the UC campus foundation acting within the scope of his or her affiliation with a UC campus foundation.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to the following disclosures:

(1) Disclosures made to a donor or prospective donor with regard to that donor’s donation or prospective donation to a UC campus foundation.

(2) Disclosures made to a volunteer or prospective volunteer with respect to that volunteer’s services being provided to a UC campus foundation.

(3) Disclosures made through other legal proceedings or as otherwise required by law.

(4) Disclosures within the scope of a disclosure required by law that limits disclosure of specified writings to certain purposes.

(5) Disclosures described in subdivision (a) of Section 92956 to an auditor conducting an audit.

(6) Disclosures described in
 subdivision (a) of Section 92956 to a bank or similar financial institution in the course of ordinary financial transactions, or in response to a request from the bank or other financial institution relating to the ordinary delivery of financial services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 3.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

92960.

Any provision in a contract entered into after the effective date of this chapter between a UC campus foundation and another party that would prevent the disclosure of information required to be disclosed pursuant to this chapter is void and unenforceable, and such a provision shall not justify a failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 3.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

92961.

This chapter shall not apply to records subject to any request made pursuant to the California Public Records Act, as set forth in Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 89.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.5. Innovation and Entrepreneurship Expansion [92965. - 92965.]

92965.

(a) With funds appropriated in Item 6440-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2016, the University of California shall make one-time expenditures for activities to expand or accelerate economic development in the state, including activities associated with the research and development of new energy technologies and storage, in ways that are aligned with other efforts to support innovation and entrepreneurship.

(b) From the funds specified in subdivision (a), two million two hundred thousand dollars ($2,200,000) shall be allocated to each of the following campuses
 of the University of California:

(1) Berkeley.

(2) Davis.

(3) Irvine.

(4) Los Angeles.

(5) Merced.

(6) Riverside.

(7) San Diego.

(8) San Francisco.

(9) Santa Barbara.

(10) Santa Cruz.

(c) The Regents of the University of California shall designate an external advisory body, whose members have demonstrated
 expertise in innovation and entrepreneurship, to encourage the effective use of the funds specified in subdivision (b) through planning and oversight.

(d) A campus shall not expend the funds specified in subdivision (b) until the external advisory body has certified that the chancellor of the campus has demonstrated all of the following:

(1) That the funds will be used only for the costs of activities that support the expansion or acceleration of economic development in the state, including activities associated with research and development of new energy technologies and storage, such as any of the following benefits for entrepreneurs:

(A) Business training.

(B) Mentorship.

(C) Proof-of-concept grants.

(D) Work space.

(E) Laboratory space.

(F) Equipment.

(G) Research and development.

(2) That the funds will be spent only after the uses and beneficiaries have been determined through a transparent, inclusive, and fair process.

(3) That private funds will also be used for these activities, with the intent that the amount of private funds will be at least equal to the amount specified in subdivision
 (b).

(4) That any financial benefit that results from the use of these funds, including any revenues generated with these funds be accounted for and also used on these activities.

(5) That a credible plan has been developed to support any ongoing activities beyond the one-time expenditures of these funds.

(e) The external advisory body shall notify the Director of Finance and the Legislature, no fewer than 10 days before providing certification pursuant to subdivision (d) of its intent to do so.

(f) (1) On or before November 30, 2017, the Regents of the University of California shall report to the Director of Finance and the Legislature on the specific activities at each campus supported by these funds.

(2) The report shall be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 250, Sec. 9.   (AB 129)   Effective September 16, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. The California Blueprint for Research to Advance Innovations in Neuroscience Act of 2014 [92985. - 92988.]

92985.

This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Blueprint for Research to Advance Innovations in Neuroscience (Cal-BRAIN) Act of 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 32.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

92985.5.

(a) In April 2013, President Obama unveiled the Brain Research through Advancing Innovative Neurotechnologies (BRAIN) Initiative — a collaborative program that will map the activity of every neuron in the human brain with a programmed total investment of more than three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) per year over 10 years.

(b) The BRAIN Initiative is launching with approximately one hundred ten million dollars ($110,000,000) in funding for research in 2014, as well as additional private sector investment from institutes and foundations based in California.

(c) California is poised to be a world leader in this research effort
 given the prominent role of scientists and industry leaders throughout the state.

(d) Four of the six scientists who proposed the BRAIN Initiative and six of the 15 members of the Advisory Committee to the Director of the National Institutes of Health for the BRAIN Initiative are from California.

(e) Some California-based corporations have indicated they are interested in collaborating with brain research institutions on research for the BRAIN Initiative to bring new discoveries to the marketplace.

(f) The BRAIN Initiative has the potential to be a major driver of new industries and jobs in biotechnology, artificial intelligence, and information technologies, as well as a catalyst for major breakthroughs in brain-related diseases, injuries, and illnesses, including Alzheimer’s disease, which is programmed to cost
 California over thirty billion dollars ($30,000,000,000) a year by 2030.

(g) The products of scientific research improve the quality of our lives and health and provide us with high-quality jobs that employ and demand a highly skilled workforce.

(h) Given California’s assets and capacity for collaboration, entrepreneurship, and innovation, a state investment to expand and accelerate this research in the state and to promote the translation of breakthroughs into the marketplace is an important investment in the intellectual infrastructure for California’s economic future.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 32.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

92986.

(a) The Regents of the University of California are requested to establish the Cal-BRAIN program to leverage California’s vast research assets and the federal BRAIN Initiative’s funding opportunities to accelerate the development of brain mapping techniques, including the development of new technologies, which will create new, high-paying jobs in California while advancing patient care and improving lives, in order to achieve the following goals:

(1) Maintain California’s leadership role in neuroscience innovation.

(2) Develop a dynamic map of the human brain that provides researchers, physicians, and engineers with the knowledge
 necessary to develop new treatments and technologies that will improve lives and reduce the costs of providing health care.

(3) Grow California’s economy through the expansion of California’s high technology and biotechnology sectors.

(4) Train the next generation of scientists for the neuroscience and engineering jobs of the future.

(b) The University of California is requested to utilize California’s unique collaborative research environment by convening stakeholders from public and private research institutions, national laboratories, biotechnology and high technology companies, and venture capital firms to develop the governing structure for the Cal-BRAIN program.

(c) The governing structure shall be designed to do all of the following:

(1) Adopt a research plan that identifies milestones for achieving the goals of the Cal-BRAIN program.

(2) Establish competitive, merit-based opportunities for interested public and private California research institutions and national laboratories to apply for Cal-BRAIN program funding.

(3) Maintain the flexibility to adjust the Cal-BRAIN program’s priorities and focus based upon knowledge gained from scientific discoveries.

(4) Establish a technology transfer program to identify and accelerate the commercial application of both early and late-stage discoveries and technologies from the Cal-BRAIN program into the marketplace and to promote new and expanded technology sectors in the state.

(5) Solicit contributions to the Cal-BRAIN program with a goal of achieving a nonstate funding match that meets or exceeds the financial investment by the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 32.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

92987.

The Regents of the University of California are requested to provide information about the Cal-BRAIN program through an Internet Web site, including a brief description of funded projects and activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 32.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

92988.

This chapter shall be implemented only to the extent that adequate funding for its purposes, as determined by the Regents of the University of California, is appropriated to the University of California in the annual Budget Act or other statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 32.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Nonresident Enrollment [93000. - 93000.]

93000.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Regents of the University of California adopt a policy that limits the share of nonresident students at every campus to no more than 18 percent of the campus’ undergraduate enrollment.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that each campus that reduces nonresident enrollment pursuant to subdivision (a) enroll a like amount of resident undergraduate students.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide annual appropriations to assist the University of California in gradually making progress toward achieving this policy at the University of California, Berkeley, the University of California, Los Angeles, and the
 University of California, San Diego campuses. It is further the intent of the Legislature that appropriations for this purpose specify both of the following:

(1) The target reduction in nonresident undergraduate enrollment for these campuses to be achieved with the appropriated funds.

(2) If the actual reduction in nonresident undergraduate enrollment for these campuses in any academic year is less than the target reduction specified in the Budget Act appropriation for that year, the Department of Finance shall adjust the University of California’s budget appropriation by the portion of the appropriation attributable to each student under the target reduction level.

(d) (1) On or before January 31 in each year of the implementation period, the University of California shall report to the
 Department of Finance and the budget committees of the Legislature on both of the following:

(A) The share of undergraduate enrollment that is nonresident by campus, including the total enrollment of undergraduate resident students by campus and the total enrollment of undergraduate nonresident students by campus.

(B) A fiscal estimate of the projected cost to make further progress for the following fiscal year.

(2) The university may fulfill these information requirements as part of other existing reports, where possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 68.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 10. PRIVATE POSTSECONDARY AND HIGHER EDUCATION INSTITUTIONS [94000. - 95010.]



  PART 59. PRIVATE POSTSECONDARY AND HIGHER EDUCATION INSTITUTIONS [94000. - 95010.]


